Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5214HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2250 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.184A Students participating in 1 a comprehensive transition and postsecondary program. 2 1. A tuition grant may be awarded to a resident of Iowa who 3 is admitted and in attendance as a student in a comprehensive 4 transition and postsecondary program that has been approved by 5 the United States department of education and that is provided 6 by any of the following: 7 a. An accredited private institution. 8 b. A community college established under chapter 260C. 9 c. An institution of higher learning governed by the state 10 board of regents. 11 2. A resident of Iowa who is admitted and in attendance as a 12 student in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary program 13 described in subsection 1 may receive tuition grants for not 14 more than eight semesters of study, or the trimester or quarter 15 equivalent. 16 3. a. The amount of a tuition grant to a resident of 17 Iowa who is admitted and in attendance as a student in a 18 comprehensive transition and postsecondary program described 19 in subsection 1 shall not exceed an amount equivalent to the 20 resident tuition and mandatory fees for two semesters, or the 21 equivalent, of the comprehensive transition and postsecondary 22 program provided by the accredited private institution, 23 community college, or institution of higher learning, as 24 applicable. 25 b. In no case may the stateâs total financial contribution 26 to the studentâs education, including financial aid under any 27 other state program, exceed the tuition and mandatory fees 28 associated with the comprehensive transition and postsecondary 29 program that the student attends. 30 4. a. A tuition grant may be made annually for the fall, 31 spring, and summer semesters, or the trimester equivalent. 32 Payments under the grant shall be allocated equally among the 33 semesters or trimesters and shall be paid at the beginning of 34 each semester or trimester upon certification by the accredited 35 -1- LSB 5214HV (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2250 private institution, community college, or institution of 1 higher learning governed by the state board of regents, as 2 applicable, that provides the comprehensive transition and 3 postsecondary program to which the student has been admitted 4 and is in attendance. 5 b. If the student discontinues attendance before the end 6 of any semester or trimester after receiving payment under 7 the grant, the entire amount of any refund due that student, 8 up to the amount of any payments made under the annual grant, 9 shall be paid by the accredited private institution, community 10 college, or institution of higher learning governed by the 11 state board of regents, as applicable, to the state. 12 Sec. 2. Section 256.189, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are 13 amended to read as follows: 14 2. The commission may require an accredited private 15 institution , community college, or institution of higher 16 learning governed by the state board of regents to promptly 17 furnish any information which the commission may request in 18 connection with the tuition grant program. 19 3. An Iowa tuition grants fund is established in the state 20 treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission 21 and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general 22 assembly and other moneys received by the commission for 23 deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated 24 to the commission for purposes of providing tuition grants 25 to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited private 26 institutions and for purposes of providing tuition grants to 27 students who are admitted and in attendance in a comprehensive 28 transition and postsecondary program described in section 29 256.184A, subsection 1 . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 30 moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not 31 revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain 32 available for expenditure for purposes of providing tuition 33 grants to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited 34 private institutions , and to students who are admitted and in 35 -2- LSB 5214HV (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 4 H.F. 2250 attendance in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary 1 program, for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 2 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the 3 fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the 4 commission for purposes of administering any scholarship or 5 grant program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 . 6